Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.250

Hearing.

If no answer be made, the case must be heard on the papers of the applicant. If the answer raises only questions of law, or puts in issue immaterial statements not affecting the substantial rights of the party, the court must proceed to hear or fix a day for hearing the argument of the case.

[ 1895 c 65 s 25; RRS s 1023.]